Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2684.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Commuter Impact Zone Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commuter impact zone." A municipality designated under this act as experiencing significant impact from regional commuter traffic or major transportation corridors."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Commuter Impact Fund established under section 12345678910111213141516171819 5."Grant recipient." A person that meets the requirements of section 3 or 4."Regional commuter traffic." Daily travel by individuals residing in one county and working in another county or state.Section 3. Commuter Impact Zone Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Commuter Impact Zone Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the department.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of the program is to award grants to municipalities designated as commuter impact zones to mitigate the impacts of regional commuter traffic.(c) Implementation.--The department shall implement the program, including the designation of commuter impact zones as follows:(1) The designation shall be based on the following criteria:(i) At least 25% of employed residents commute outside the county or this Commonwealth.(ii) Interstate traffic volume on interstate and major arterial highways exceeds 150% of the county population on a daily basis.(iii) Presence of major interstate corridors.(iv) Demonstrated infrastructure strain, including road degradation and congestion.(v) Environmental impacts, including storm water, flooding, air quality and watershed disruption based on department data.(vi) Impacts to historic or established community structures.(vii) Presence of highway segments identified as 20260HB2684PN3739 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 high-risk or safety-priority corridors based on crash data, congestion patterns or Federal and State safety analysis.(2) Initial designation shall include municipalities meeting the criteria established under paragraph (1).(d) Eligible use of grants.--A grant recipient under this section may use money from the program for the following purposes:(1) Road and bridge repair and maintenance.(2) Traffic safety improvements.(3) Storm water management and flood mitigation.(4) Environmental restoration related to transportation impacts.(5) Pedestrian and community reconnection projects.(6) Emergency services support related to transportation burden.(e) Procedure.--The department shall develop rules and procedures for awarding grants under the program in accordance with subsection (c). The department may approve a grant recipient that meets the rules and procedures developed by the department under this subsection.(f) Limitation.--A grant awarded under the program may not exceed $5,000,000 per year for a grant recipient.Section 4. Commuter Impact Mitigation Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Commuter Impact Mitigation Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the department.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of the program is to award grants to municipalities designated as commuter impact zones to support residential mitigation measures and small business stabilization 20260HB2684PN3739 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and access improvements.(c) Implementation.--The department shall implement the program, including the development of a process to review and approve annual grant applications under the program.(d) Eligible use of grants.--A grant recipient may use a grant under the program for the following purposes:(1) Residential mitigation measures, including:(i) Noise reduction improvements.(ii) Indoor air quality improvements.(iii) Storm water and flood mitigation for impacted properties.(iv) Vegetative buffers and environmental screening.(v) Other measures deemed necessary by the department to protect public health and housing stability.(2) Small business stabilization and access improvements, including:(i) Assistance for businesses experiencing demonstrated revenue disruption due to transportation-related construction, congestion or access limitations.(ii) Improvements to business access and visibility.(iii) Temporary mitigation measures to maintain customer access during infrastructure projects.(iv) Local economic recovery and promotion efforts.(e) Procedure.--The department shall develop a procedure for awarding grants under the program. The procedure shall:(1) Include and prioritize deployments that support areas experiencing the greatest impacts from regional commuter traffic.(2) Establish a minimum business disruption requirement 20260HB2684PN3739 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for a grant applicant to be eligible for a grant under the program, measured in a percentage of profits or sales lost due to impacts of regional commuter traffic.(f) Limitation.--A grant awarded under the program may not exceed $5,000,000 per year for each grant recipient.Section 5. Commuter Impact Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Commuter Impact Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the fund, including interest and other earnings, is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for grants under the Commuter Impact Zone Grant Program and the Commuter Impact Mitigation Grant Program.(c) Appropriation.--Each fiscal year, the department may expend not more than 2% of the fund for the expense of administrating the Commuter Impact Zone Grant Program and the Commuter Impact Mitigation Grant Program.Section 6. Planning requirements.The department shall:(1) Incorporate commuter impact zone designation into transportation planning and project development.(2) Evaluate and mitigate impacts of major highway projects within designated zones.(3) Coordinate with municipalities to identify priority mitigation and community protection projects.(4) Prioritize safety, access and commuter impact mitigation in areas where highway corridors demonstrate elevated crash rates, congestion or operation disruptions affecting adjacent communities.(5) Supplement and not supplant existing Federal and State transportation funding and safety programs.20260HB2684PN3739 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) When planning an expansion project that involves property under the jurisdiction of a municipality, receive the approval of the municipality in accordance with section 7.Section 7. Municipality approval.(a) Required approval.--Prior to initiating an expansion project on an interstate highway that passes through a municipality, the department shall submit a written application for approval to the governing body of the municipality.(b) Contents of application.--The application shall include, at a minimum:(1) A description of the proposed expansion project.(2) The anticipated timeline for construction of the proposed expansion project.(3) An assessment of the anticipated impact on a local road or property within the municipality.(c) Action by governing body of municipality.--No later than 90 days after receipt of an application, the governing body of a municipality shall approve or disapprove the application during a meeting of the governing body of a municipality. If an application is disapproved, the municipality shall communicate to the department the reasons for the disapproval and potential acceptable changes to the application no later than 90 days after the disapproval of the application.(d) Resubmittal of an application.--If an application submitted by the department under subsection (c) was disapproved, the department may resubmit an amended application and detail any changes made regarding any previous communications from the municipality regarding the application. No later than 90 days after the receipt of resubmittal of a 20260HB2684PN3739 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disapproved application, the governing body of the municipality shall approve or disapprove the application during a meeting of the governing body of the municipality. If the resubmitted application is disapproved, the municipality shall communicate to the department the reasons for the disapproval and potential acceptable changes to the application no later than 90 days after the disapproval of the application. The department may continue to resubmit applications until a compromise is achieved.Section 8. Annual report.(a) Requirement.--The department shall prepare an annual report concerning actions taken under this act by December 31, 2026, and each December 31 thereafter. The annual report shall be submitted to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The members of the General Assembly.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--The annual report shall include the following:(1) Designated commuter impact zones.(2) Money distributed under this act.(3) Projects funded with grants approved under this act.(4) Commuter mitigation measures implemented.(5) Measurable outcomes related to infrastructure, safety, environmental conditions and economic stability.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2684PN3739 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930